Utah statutes.
19-7-109.   Incentives for voluntary disclosure and compliance -- Waiver of
civil penalties.
(1)  As used in this section, "regulated entity" means any person, business,
or other entity subject to regulation under Title 19, Environmental Quality
Code.
(2)  The department shall waive civil penalties for an instance of
noncompliance with an environmental law or requirement:
(a)  that a regulated entity discovered through an environmental self-
evaluation;
(b)  that a regulated entity voluntarily disclosed to the department in
writing within 21 days after the entity's  discovery of the violation;
(c)  that a regulated entity remedied or corrected within 60 days after
discovery of the violation, or within a reasonable amount of time if the
violation cannot be remedied within 60 days; and
(d)  regarding which the regulated entity submitted to the department a
written outline of reasonable steps the regulated entity will take to prevent
a recurrence.
(3)  The department may not waive penalties under Subsection (2) if:
(a)  the instance of noncompliance resulted from a lack of due diligence in
complying with environmental laws, taking into account the size and nature of
the regulated entity;
(b)  the instance of noncompliance is a recurrence of a similarly caused
specific violation or a violation of the specific terms of a judicial or
administrative consent order or agreement;
(c)  the instance of noncompliance resulted from reckless or willful disregard
of environmental laws;
(d)  the regulated entity conducted the environmental self-evaluation for a
fraudulent purpose;
(e)  the department had already initiated a compliance investigation at the
time of the disclosure and the regulated entity had been advised of or was
aware of the investigation;
(f)  the instance of noncompliance was discovered pursuant to a legally
mandated monitoring, testing, or sampling requirement prescribed by law, rule,
permit, order, or consent agreement; or
(g)  the instance of noncompliance resulted in serious actual harm or imminent
and substantial endangerment to human health or the environment.
(4) (a)  To the extent the instance of noncompliance resulted in an economic
benefit or competitive advantage over other similar regulated entities that
did achieve compliance, the department may seek a civil penalty to recover the
monetary amount of the economic benefit or competitive advantage resulting
from the incidence of noncompliance.
(b)  Action under this Subsection (4) is not prohibited by Subsection (2).
(5)  This section does not limit the department's discretion in reducing
penalties for noncompliance with an environmental law which may not fully
qualify for waiver under this section, but which the department determines
should be appropriately reduced.
